Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8402.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 40 of the General Laws entitled "HUMAN SERVICES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 23
PERMANENT JOINT STUDY COMMISSION ON AGING AND MULTI-SECTOR PLAN ON
AGING
40-23-1. Establishment.
(a) There is hereby established a permanent house and senate joint study commission to be
known as the “permanent joint legislative study commission on aging” (the “permanent
commission”).
(b) The permanent commission shall guide, develop, and oversee the implementation of
the Rhode Island multi-sector plan on aging.
40-23-2. Membership.
(a) The permanent commission shall consist of nineteen (19) members:
(1) Three (3) members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker, one of
whom shall serve as co-chairperson;
(2) Three (3) members of the senate appointed by the president, one of whom shall serve
as co-chairperson;
(3) The director of the office of healthy aging, or designee;

(4) The secretary of the executive office of health and human services, or designee;
(5) The director of the department of health, or designee;
(6) The secretary of housing, or designee;
(7) The director of the Rhode Island public transit authority, or designee;
(8) The chair of the state commission on aging, or designee;
(9) The chair of the long-term care coordinating council, or designee;
(10) The executive director of the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns, or designee;
(11) The executive director of the Senior Agenda Coalition of Rhode Island;
(12) One member who is a municipal senior center director appointed by the speaker;
(13) Three (3) public members jointly appointed by the speaker and the president who shall
represent the aging or disabled community and possess lived experience or expertise in matters
affecting older adults or persons with disabilities. At least one public member shall be sixty (60)
years of age or older, and at least one public member shall be an adult with disabilities or a
representative of a disability stakeholder organization.
(b) The three (3) public members shall collectively reflect a mix of residents from urban
and rural communities within the state.
(c) Appointments shall seek representation of diverse racial, cultural, gender, and ability
groups.
(d) Legislative members serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Public members
serve staggered three (3) year terms.
(e) The permanent commission shall have the authority to establish subcommittees
appointed by the chairpersons, to further the implementation of this chapter. The permanent
commission shall have the authority to appoint the chairpersons and the members to these
subcommittees.
40-23-3. Multi-sector plan on aging.
(a) The permanent commission shall develop and periodically update a comprehensive
multi-sector plan on aging (“MPA”) to serve as the general assembly’s coordinated long-term
framework for addressing the needs of older adults and persons with disabilities.
(b) The MPA shall address, at a minimum, the following domains:
(1) Housing;
(2) Transportation;
(3) Access to services;
(4) Municipal services;
(5) Economic security; and
LC004397/SUB A/2 - Page 2 of 6

(6) Healthcare.
(c) The MPA shall include:
(1) An assessment of demographic trends and projected growth of older Rhode Islanders;
(2) Identification of disparities and structural barriers affecting aging outcomes;
(3) Broad goals and strategic priorities within each domain;
(4) Identification of opportunities for improved interagency coordination and collaboration
with municipalities and community partners;
(5) Recommendations for legislative, regulatory, and budgetary actions necessary to
advance the goals of the plan;
(6) Strategies to promote aging in place and strengthen home- and community-based
services.
(d) The initial multi-sector plan shall be adopted within eighteen (18) months of enactment.
(e) The plan shall be updated no less than every four (4) years.
40-23-4. Duties.
The permanent commission shall:
(1) Encourage agencies at all levels of government to prioritize planning for older Rhode
Islanders in strategic plans, capital planning, and program development;
(2) Facilitate joint policy development among state agencies and municipalities to promote
innovation, efficiency, and effective use of public resources;
(3) Request information and implementation updates from relevant state agencies;
(4) Establish advisory subcommittees aligned with the domains identified in § 40-23-4 as
necessary; and
(5) Conduct no fewer than four (4) public meetings annually.
40-23-5. Annual report.
(a) On or before January 15 of each year, the permanent commission shall submit a written
report describing progress on the multi-sector plan on aging and recommendations for legislative
or budgetary action to:
(1) The governor;
(2) The president of the senate;
(3) The speaker of the house of representatives;
(4) The chairperson of the senate committee on health and human services;
(5) The chairperson of the house committee on health and human services;
(6) The chairperson of the senate committee on finance;
(7) The chairperson of the house committee on finance;
LC004397/SUB A/2 - Page 3 of 6

(8) The chairperson of the senate committee on housing and municipal government; and
(9) The chairperson of the house committee on municipal government and housing.
(b) Executive branch agencies identified in the multi-sector plan shall, within ninety (90)
days of issuance of the annual report, submit a written response outlining actions taken, planned
actions, or reasons for non-implementation of recommendations relevant to their agency.
(c) The annual report and agency responses shall be made publicly available.
40-23-6. Administrative and financial support.
(a) The general assembly shall determine and provide staff support. The office of healthy
aging shall provide technical assistance upon request.
(b) Funding pursuant to this section shall be subject to appropriation by the general
assembly.
40-23-7. Permanency.
The permanent commission shall be permanent and shall not sunset unless repealed by a
subsequent act of the general assembly.
40-23-8. Coordination of federal reporting with the Rhode Island multi-sector plan
on aging.
(a) The state unit on aging, currently the Rhode Island office of healthy aging (“OHA”),
shall coordinate reporting required under the Older Americans Act (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.) with
the development, implementation, and evaluation of the Rhode Island multi-sector plan on aging
and the permanent commission.
(b) To the maximum extent practicable, data, analyses, and performance measures
collected for federal reporting required under the Older Americans Act shall be used to inform and
support the goals, strategies, and progress monitoring of the state’s multi-sector plan on aging.
(c) The OHA shall ensure that information collected by state departments and service
providers for federal reporting purposes is integrated into the planning, evaluation, and continuous
improvement of the multi-sector plan on aging.
(d) The multi-sector plan on aging may incorporate, where appropriate:
(1) Performance indicators and service data reported pursuant to the Older Americans Act;
(2) Demographic and service utilization data from the state OHA;
(3) Measures related to health, housing, transportation, economic security, caregiving, and
community supports affecting older adults and adults with disabilities; and
(4) Cross-agency data necessary to track progress toward statewide aging policy goals.
(e) Nothing in this section shall alter or diminish federal reporting obligations required to
receive funding under the Older Americans Act, but shall ensure that such reporting is leveraged
LC004397/SUB A/2 - Page 4 of 6

to support statewide strategic planning for Rhode Island’s aging population.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on September 1, 2026.
========
LC004397/SUB A/2
========
LC004397/SUB A/2 - Page 5 of 6